Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.080

Funding—Local tax authority.

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this section, a county creating a program under this chapter may impose sales and use taxes under RCW 82.14.525 or additional regular property tax levies under RCW 84.52.821 for the purposes authorized under this chapter.

(b) A county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more may not impose additional regular property tax levies under RCW 84.52.821.

(2) If a county imposes sales and use taxes under RCW 82.14.525, the county may not impose an additional regular property tax levy under RCW 84.52.821 so long as such sales and use taxes are in effect.

(3) If a county imposes an additional regular property tax levy under RCW 84.52.821, the county may not impose sales and use taxes under RCW 82.14.525 so long as such property tax levy is in effect.

(4) All revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter must be credited to a special fund in the treasury of the county imposing such tax and used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of cultural access programs as provided in this chapter.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 401.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.